District of Columbia statutes.
2-1371

Findings.

The Council finds that:

(1)

On September 26, 1995, pursuant to Mayor’s Order 95-119, the District of Columbia Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs (“Commission”) was established to advise the Mayor and advocate for the interests of the Asian and Pacific Islander communities.

(2)

The Commission has worked to:

(A)

Improve the delivery of human services;

(B)

Increase the number of Asians and Pacific Islanders serving on District of Columbia boards and commissions and working for the District of Columbia government;

(C)

Promote positive relations between Asian and Pacific Islanders and other ethnic groups;

(D)

Encourage and support economic development and the historical preservation of Chinatown; and

(E)

Provide assistance and support to Asian small businesses.

(3)

Since 1986, these communities have grown to include more than 17,000 Asians and Pacific Islanders.

(4)

The growth of these communities gives rise to the need for a statutorily established office and commission to:

(A)

Advise and assist the District of Columbia government in the development of governmental programs and initiatives to respond to the developing needs of these communities;

(B)

Advocate for the needs of these communities;

(C)

Serve as an official liaison between the District of Columbia government and these communities; and

(D)

Ensure that the residents of these communities have access to necessary public services and facilities.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 302, 48 DCR 6981

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 302 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).